Tennessee, session 114, HB1897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-2-141, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(f)
(1) Each county election commission shall check each applicant for registration
with the systematic alien verification for entitlements (SAVE) program database prior to
placing a registrant on the voter rolls in order to ensure non-United States citizens are
not registered to vote in the county.
(2) At least once each quarter, the county election commission shall check the
county's entire voter registration list through the SAVE program database to ensure that
non-United States citizens are not on the voter rolls in the county.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1897
011845
- 1 -